Mississippi, session 2026, HB4169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Chapter 912, Local and Private Laws of 1993, is amended as follows: Section 1.  (1) * * *  (a)  The Board of Supervisors of DeSoto County, Mississippi, is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, to levy additional court costs in an amount not to exceed One Dollar ($1.00) per case for each misdemeanor filed in the justice court of such county. (b)  The governing authorities of the cities of Hernando, Olive Branch, Horn Lake and Southaven are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, by resolution duly adopted and entered on the minutes of each governing authority, to levy additional court costs in an amount not to exceed One Dollar ($1.00) per case for each misdemeanor filed in the municipal courts of such municipalities. (2) The avails of any additional court costs imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be paid monthly by each * * * county and municipality to * * *DeSoto County Crimestoppers, Inc., the State Crime Stoppers Program for use in procuring information which will lead to the capture and conviction of persons committing crimes in DeSoto County, Mississippi. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.